Washington statutes.
RCW 27.40.030

Acceptance of materials from private sources.

This museum may receive all such above named documents or material for preservation and exhibition from any private person under such rules and regulations as the board of regents of the University of Washington may deem proper to make for the care of the aforesaid museum.

[ 1899 c 30 s 3; RRS s 8257.]